Utah statutes.
57-1-41.   Objections to reconveyance or release.

A title insurer or title agent may not record a reconveyance of trust deed or release of mortgage if, within 60 days from the day on which the title insurer or title agent delivered or mailed the notice of intent to release or reconvey in accordance with Subsections 57-1-40(3) and (4), the beneficiary, mortgagee, or servicer sends a notice that:

(1)  the obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage has not been paid in full;

(2)  payment of an amount less than the whole obligation was not agreed to or was not received by the beneficiary, mortgagee, or servicer; or

(3)  the beneficiary, mortgagee, or servicer objects to the release of the mortgage or reconveyance of the trust deed under Subsection 57-1-40(5)(a).



Amended by Chapter 403, 2013 General Session

